Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.150

Certificates of licensure—Issuance—Contents—Seal.

(1) The director shall issue a certificate of licensure to any applicant who has, to the satisfaction of the board, met all the requirements for licensure upon payment of the licensure fee as provided in this chapter. All certificates of licensure shall show the full name of the licensee, have the license number, and shall be signed by the chair of the board and by the director. The issuance of a certificate of licensure by the director is prima facie evidence that the person named therein is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a licensed landscape architect.

(2) Each licensee shall obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board bearing the landscape architect's name, license number, the legend "Licensed Landscape Architect," and the name of this state. Drawings prepared by the licensee shall be sealed and signed by the licensee when filed with public authorities. It is unlawful to seal and sign a document after a licensee's certificate of licensure or authorization has expired, been revoked, or is suspended. A landscape architect shall not seal and sign technical submissions not prepared by the landscape architect or his or her regularly employed subordinates or individuals under his or her direct control, or if prepared by a landscape architect licensed in any jurisdiction recognized by the board, reviewed and accepted as the sealing landscape architect's own work; a landscape architect who signs or seals drawings or specifications that he or she has reviewed is responsible to the same extent as if prepared by that landscape architect.

[ 2009 c 370 s 14; 1993 c 35 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.